New Jersey, session 222, A139.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a casino licensee and the employees agents, and contracted operators thereof, shall be prohibited from posting, distributing, broadcasting, disseminating, or otherwise making viewable to the public any casino gaming related advertising via any Internet website or any web-based platform which is primarily intended for use by individuals under the age of 12, including mobile applications, and from sponsoring or financing any such advertisements in this State. The Division of Gaming Enforcement shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), promulgate any rules or regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section, and shall undertake any legal actions as may be necessary to fully enforce the provisions of this section. 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a sports wagering licensee and the employees agents, and contracted operators thereof, shall be prohibited from posting, distributing, broadcasting, disseminating, or otherwise making viewable to the public any sports pool related advertising via any Internet website or any web-based platform which is primarily intended for use by individuals under the age of 12, including mobile applications, and from sponsoring or financing any such advertisements in this State. The Division of Gaming Enforcement shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), promulgate any rules or regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section, and shall undertake any legal actions as may be necessary to fully enforce the provisions of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 60th day after the date of enactment.